Washington statutes.
RCW 13.90.020

Petition for guardianship—Requirements.

(1) A vulnerable youth may petition the court that a vulnerable youth guardianship be established for him or her by filing a petition in juvenile court under this chapter. The proposed guardian must agree to join in the petition, and must receive notice of the petition.

(2) To be designated as a proposed guardian in a petition under this chapter, a person must be age twenty-one or over, suitable, and capable of performing the duties of guardian under RCW 13.90.040, including but not limited to parents, licensed foster parents, relatives, and suitable persons.

(3) The petition must allege and show that:

(a) Both the petitioner and the proposed guardian agree to the establishment of a guardianship;

(b) The youth is between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one years;

(c) The youth is prima facie eligible to apply for classification under 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(27)(J);

(d) The youth requests the support of a responsible adult; and

(e) The proposed guardian agrees to serve as guardian, and is a suitable adult over twenty-one years old who is capable of performing the duties of a guardian as stated in RCW 13.90.040.

(4) There must be no fee associated with the filing of a vulnerable youth guardianship petition by or for a vulnerable youth under this section.

[ 2017 c 279 s 4.]